ubuntu.slaves.black/1/packages/xuxen-eu-spell/src/hunspell/eu-ES.aff
FLAG num
SFX 321    a       onoi      a
SFX 321    a       onok      a
SFX 321    a       onokin      a
SFX 321    a       onontzat      a
SFX 321    a       onotaz      a
SFX 321    a       onoz      a
SFX 321    a       oni      a
SFX 321    a       onik      a
SFX 321    a       onean      a
SFX 321    a       oneraino      a
SFX 321    a       onerantz      a
SFX 321    a       onerat      a
SFX 321    a       onera      a
SFX 321    a       onetik      a
SFX 321    0       n      .
